District of Columbia statutes.
34-1806

Replacement of equipment.

No later than October 1, 2007, the Office of Unified Communications shall establish a schedule for the replacement of equipment for the 911 system. The schedule shall be updated on February 1 of each subsequent year.

Oct. 19, 2000, D.C. Law 13-172, § 605b
as added Sept. 18, 2007, D.C. Law 17-20, § 3022(c), 54 DCR 7052
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 3022(c) of Fiscal Year 2008 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-74, July 25, 2007, 54 DCR 7549).